Massachusetts, session 194th, H3650.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1: General Laws Part I Title XVI Chapter 111E, is amended to include the
following Section 9B which provides:
(a) For the purposes of this section, “incapacitated” shall have the same meaning as
is defined in Section 9A of Chapter 111E.
(b) Where an incapacitated person is found to be the operator of or in possession of a
motor vehicle on a public way, that motor vehicle shall be towed away and impounded for a
period of twelve (12) hours.
(c) This (12) hour impoundment period shall be calculated from the time the vehicle
is towed. The costs for the towing, storage and maintenance of the vehicle shall be borne by the
of 2

operator or individual who retrieves the vehicle after the twelve (12) hour hold period is
complete.
of 2